Utah statutes.
78B-11-122.   Remedies -- Fees and expenses of arbitration proceeding.

(1)  An arbitrator may award punitive damages or other exemplary relief if the award is authorized by law in a civil action involving the same claim and the evidence produced at the hearing justifies the award under the legal standards otherwise applicable to the claim.

(2)  An arbitrator may award reasonable attorney fees and other reasonable expenses of arbitration if the award is authorized by law in a civil action involving the same claim or by the agreement of the parties to the arbitration proceeding.

(3)  As to all remedies other than those authorized by Subsections (1) and (2), an arbitrator may order any remedies as the arbitrator considers just and appropriate under the circumstances of the arbitration proceeding.  The fact that a remedy could not or would not be granted by the court is not a ground for refusing to confirm an award under Section 78B-11-123 or for vacating an award under Section 78B-11-124.

(4)  An arbitrator's expenses and fees, together with other expenses, must be paid as provided in the award.

(5)  If an arbitrator awards punitive damages or other exemplary relief under Subsection (1), the arbitrator shall specify in the award the basis in fact justifying, and the basis in law authorizing, the award and state separately the amount of the punitive damages or other exemplary relief.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

